Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-268.02
Garbage or refuse; nuisance; removal by city; assess cost.

Whenever any city of the primary class removes any garbage or refuse from any lot, lots, or land pursuant to section 15-268.01, it shall, after a hearing before and conducted by the city council, assess the cost of the removal against such lot, lots, or land.

Laws 1977, LB 74, § 2.